Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.120

Creating a local infrastructure project area.

(1) Before adopting an ordinance or resolution creating one or more local infrastructure project areas, a sponsoring city must:

(a) Provide notice to the county assessor, county treasurer, and county within the proposed local infrastructure project area of the sponsoring city's intent to create one or more local infrastructure project areas. This notice must be provided at least one hundred eighty days in advance of the public hearing as required by (b) of this subsection;

(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed formation of the local infrastructure project area.

(2) A sponsoring city may create one or more local infrastructure project areas by ordinance or resolution that:

(a) Describes the proposed public improvements, identified in the plan under RCW 39.108.080, to be financed in each local infrastructure project area;

(b) Describes the boundaries of each local infrastructure project area, subject to the limitations in RCW 39.108.130; and

(c) Provides the date when the use of local property tax allocation revenues will commence and a list of the participating taxing districts.

(3) The sponsoring city must deliver a certified copy of the adopted ordinance or resolution to the county assessor, county treasurer, and each other participating taxing district within which the local infrastructure project area is located.

[ 2011 c 318 s 601.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.